Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.045

Collection of unlawful debt.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly to collect any unlawful debt. A violation of this section is a class C felony.

[ 2001 c 222 s 7. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 6.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.